Washington statutes.
RCW 15.30.220

Injunctions authorized.

The director may bring an action to enjoin the violation or threatened violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted pursuant to this chapter in the superior court in the county in which such violation occurs or is about to occur, notwithstanding the existence of any other remedies at law.

[ 1961 c 29 s 22.]